California, session 20252026, AB776.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 35000 of the Education Code is amended to read:35000. (a) The first governing board of any a new school district shall, at the first meeting of the governing board or as soon as practicable thereafter, name the school district.(b) The name of an elementary school district shall be in the form of “____ District” (using the name of the district). The name of an elementary school district shall not include a number.(c) The name of a unified school district shall be in the form of “____ Unified School District” (using the name of the district). A number shall not be used as a part of the designation of any a unified school district.